Mississippi, session 2026, HB887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 51-5-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-5-5.  (1)  In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall have, but shall not be limited to, the following powers: (a)  Make reasonable rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. (b)  Prepare required forms and establish other procedures to govern the submission of applications, reports, and other information authorized to be sent the commission as required by this chapter. (c)  Prepare and give reasonable oral and/or written examinations for license applicants. (d)  Deposit all fees in a special fund for the implementation of this chapter. (e)  Enter upon and be given access to any premises for the purpose of inspecting water wells. (f)  Require and approve the completion of continuing education units for license renewal applicants.  The commission shall provide exemptions from continuing education units for (i) persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older and (ii) persons with at least twenty (20) years of experience as a water well contractor in the State of Mississippi. (2)  If the commission finds that compliance with all the requirements of this chapter would result in undue hardship, an exemption from any one or more of such requirements may be granted by the commission to the extent necessary to ameliorate such undue hardship and to the extent such exemption can be granted without impairing the intent and purpose of this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.